Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.390

Jury may be polled.

After the verdict is announced, but before it is filed, the jury may be polled at the request of either party. Each juror may be asked whether the verdict is his or her individual verdict and whether the verdict is the jury's collective verdict. If it appears that the verdict is insufficient because the required number of jurors have not reached agreement, the jurors may be returned to the jury room for further deliberation.

[ 2003 c 406 s 22; 1972 ex.s. c 57 s 6; 1895 c 36 s 2; RRS s 359.]